src/third_party/hunspell/tests/ngram_utf_fix.aff
# Test fix of suffixed ngram suggestions with UTF-8 encoding and long flags.
# Based on Vitaly Piryatinsky's bug report and example.
SET UTF-8
FLAG num

PFX 101 Y 1
PFX 101 0 пред .

SFX 1381 Y 1
SFX 1381 0 о .

SFX 2000 Y 3
SFX 2000 0 ам .
SFX 2000 0 ами .
SFX 2000 0 ах .

SFX 2022 Y 4
SFX 2022 0 а .
SFX 2022 0 у .
SFX 2022 0 ом .
SFX 2022 0 е .
